Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 4. Civil Remedies for Wrongful Use of Utility Facilities

§ 37-12-401.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Bypassing” means the act of attaching, connecting or in any manner affixing any wire, cord, socket, motor, pipe or other instrument, device or contrivance to the utility supply system or any part thereof in such a manner as to transmit, supply or use any utility service without passing through an authorized meter or other device provided for measuring, registering, determining or limiting the amount of electricity, gas, steam or water consumed;

“Customer” means the person responsible for payment for utility services and includes employees and agents of the customer;

“Tampering” means the act of damaging, altering, adjusting or in any manner interfering with or obstructing the action or operation of any meter or other device provided for measuring, registering, determining or limiting the amount of electricity, gas, steam or water consumed;

“Unauthorized metering” means the act of removing, moving, installing, connecting, reconnecting or disconnecting any meter or metering device for utility service by a person other than an authorized contractor, employee or agent of the utility;

“Utility” means any pipeline corporation, gas corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation, irrigation system, cooperative association, nonprofit corporation, nonprofit association, municipality or person operating in whole or in part for the purpose of supplying electricity, gas, steam or nonagricultural water, or any combination thereof, to the public or to any person;

“Utility service” means the provision of electricity, gas, steam, water or any other service or commodity furnished by the utility for compensation;

“Utility supply system” means all wires, conduits, pipes, cords, sockets, motors, meters, instruments, pumps and any other material and equipment the utility uses to provide utility services;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 110, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(viii), which read: "`This article' means W.S.

37-12-401

through

37-12-403

."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 37-12-402.
Civil action allowed.

In addition to any applicable criminal penalties, a utility may bring a civil action for damages against any person who:

Commits, authorizes, solicits, aids, abets or attempts any act of bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering resulting in damages to the utility;

Knowingly receives utility service through bypassing, tampering or unauthorized metering.

Any action brought under this section shall be commenced within three (3) years after the cause of action accrues.

In any civil action brought under this section, the utility, upon proof of willful or intentional bypassing, tampering or unauthorized metering, may recover as damages two (2) times the amount of its actual damages plus all reasonable expenses incurred because of the bypassing, tampering or unauthorized metering, including expenses for investigation, disconnection, reconnection, service calls, employees and equipment, expert witnesses, costs of the suit and reasonable attorney fees.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 110, § 1.

§ 37-12-403.
Remedies cumulative.

This article is intended to provide additional remedies to avoid the wrongful use of the facilities of utilities and nothing in this article abridges or alters other rights of action or remedies existing before or after the effective date of this act.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 110, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The phrase “the effective date of this act” refers to the effective date of Laws 1985, ch. 110, § 2, which became effective on May 23, 1985.